Wisconsin, session 2025, AB776.
do enact as follows:AB776,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB776,24Section 2. 20.485 (2) (qw) of the statutes is created to read:AB776,2,7520.485 (2) (qw) Veterans mental health services. Biennially, the amounts in 6the schedule for the promotion and assistance of access to, and grants for, veterans’ 7mental health services under s. 45.49.AB776,38Section 3. 45.49 of the statutes is created to read:AB776,2,11945.49 Veterans mental health services. (1) The department shall 10promote and assist veterans’ access to, and provide grants to organizations that 11provide to veterans, community-based and emergency crisis mental health services.AB776,2,1712(2) The department may promulgate emergency rules under s. 227.24 as 13necessary to administer this section. Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (a) and (3), the 14department is not required to provide evidence that promulgating a rule under this 15subsection as an emergency rule is necessary for the preservation of the public 16peace, health, safety, or welfare and is not required to provide a finding of 17emergency for a rule promulgated under this subsection.AB776,2,1818